Utah statutes.
78B-15-601.   Proceeding authorized -- Definition.

(1)  An adjudicative proceeding may be maintained to determine the parentage of a child.  A judicial proceeding is governed by the rules of civil procedure.  An administrative proceeding is governed by Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(2)  For the purposes of this part, "divorce" also includes an annulment.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

